Washington statutes.
RCW 11.106.010

Scope of chapter—Exceptions.

This chapter does not apply to resulting trusts, constructive trusts, business trusts where certificates of beneficial interest are issued to the beneficiaries, investment trusts, voting trusts, insurance trusts prior to the death of the insured, trusts in the nature of mortgages or pledges, liquidation trusts or trusts for the sole purpose of paying dividends, interest or interest coupons, salaries, wages or pensions; nor does this chapter apply to personal representatives.

[ 2013 c 272 s 25; 1985 c 30 s 95. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 128; 1955 c 33 s 30.30.010; prior: 1951 c 226 s 10. Formerly RCW 30.30.010.]

NOTES:

Application—2013 c 272: See note following RCW 11.98.002.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.